California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 adopt regulations by July 1, 2027, to implement this section. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the department may implement and administer the changes made by this legislation through all-county letters, information notices, or similar written instructions until regulations are adopted.

(h) (1) If the department determines it is necessary, it shall seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services before implementing this section.

(2) If the department makes the determination that it is necessary to seek federal approval pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall make an official
 request for approval from the federal government no later than January 1, 2017.

(i) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available and all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(j) Commencing July 1, 2024, in the case of placement of foster children in short-term residential therapeutic programs, community treatment facilities, or group homes, or in the case of admission of foster children to children’s crisis residential programs, this section shall apply only if the circumstances described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14717.2 exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 160.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.2.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “foster child” or “foster children” means a Medi-Cal eligible child or children younger than 21 years of age who have been placed into foster care by a county child welfare agency or a county probation department.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that foster children who are placed in community treatment facilities, group homes, or short-term residential therapeutic programs, or who are admitted to children’s crisis residential programs, outside of their county of original jurisdiction, are able to access specialty mental health services in a timely manner, consistent with their individual strengths and needs and the requirements of federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic,
 and Treatment (EPSDT) services.

(3) The Legislature finds that because group home placements or short-term residential therapeutic program placements are intended to be short term, and because community treatment facility placements and children’s crisis residential program admissions are intended to be time-limited based on medical necessity, the responsibility for the provision of or arrangement for specialty mental health services for a foster child throughout the short-term or time-limited placement or admission shall remain with the county of original jurisdiction.

(4) The Legislature intends that the placement of a foster child in a group home, community treatment facility, or short-term residential therapeutic program, or the admission of the child to a children’s crisis residential program outside of the county of original jurisdiction should not disrupt continuity of care
 or adversely impact timely payment to the provider of specialty mental health services.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2024, a foster child’s county of original jurisdiction shall retain responsibility to arrange and provide specialty mental health services if the foster child is placed out of the county of original jurisdiction in a community treatment facility, group home, or short-term residential therapeutic program, or is admitted to a children’s crisis residential program, as these settings are defined in paragraph (8), (13), (18), or (21), respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The case plan for the foster child specifies that the child will transition to a less restrictive placement in the same county as the facility in which the child has been placed.

(2) The placing agency determines, as informed by the child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, that the child will be negatively impacted if responsibility for providing or arranging for specialty mental health services is not transferred to the same county as the facility in which the child has been placed. The placing agency shall document the basis for making this determination in the child’s case record and may include in a child and family team meeting the mental health plan of the receiving county where the facility is located. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage local coordination with the receiving county mental health plan.

(c) If the circumstances in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) exist, the process for presumptive transfer of responsibility for arranging and providing specialty mental health services set
 forth in Section 14717.1 shall apply.

(d) (1) To support service delivery, continuity of care, and timely payment, the placing agency shall provide notification to the mental health plan that will be responsible for arranging and providing specialty mental health services for the foster child before placing a foster child out of county in a community treatment facility, group home, or short-term residential therapeutic program, or admitting a foster child to a children’s crisis residential program. The placing agency may complete these notifications through email. If notification before placement or admission is not possible, the placing agency shall notify the appropriate mental health plan no later than three business days after making the out-of-county placement.

(2) Upon accepting placement or admission of a foster child, a group home, short-term
 residential therapeutic program, community treatment facility, or children’s crisis residential program may notify the mental health plan that will be responsible for arranging and providing specialty mental health services for the foster child that the foster child has been admitted to a children’s crisis residential program or placed in a group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or community treatment facility.

(e) If the circumstances in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) exist at any point during the foster child’s placement or admission out of county, Section 14717.1 shall apply.

(f) The placing agency shall document which mental health plan is responsible for providing or arranging for specialty mental health services.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department and the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or similar written instructions, until regulations are adopted.

(2) By July 1, 2027, the department and the State Department of Social Services shall adopt regulations to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) (1) If the department determines it is necessary, it shall seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services before implementing this section.

(2) If the department makes the determination that it is necessary to seek federal approval pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall make an official request for approval from the federal government no later than July 1, 2025.

(i) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available and all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 161.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.25.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “foster child” or “foster children” means a Medi-Cal eligible child or children younger than 21 years of age who have been placed into foster care by a county child welfare agency or a county probation department.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to support timely payment to the provider for services to help ensure foster children placed out of county receive the care and treatment that they need.

(b) If a foster child who needs to receive, or who is already receiving, specialty mental health services is placed out of county in a group home, community treatment facility, children’s crisis residential program,
 or short-term residential therapeutic program, and responsibility for providing and arranging for the child’s specialty mental health services is not transferred, in accordance with Sections 14717.1 and 14717.2, the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction and the specialty mental health services provider may choose one of the following options in order to ensure timely payment for specialty mental health services provided to the foster child:

(1) Utilize an existing contract between the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction and the specialty mental health services provider for payment of services within a mutually agreed upon timeframe.

(2) Establish a contract for payment of specialty mental health services for a foster child or multiple foster children for payment of services within a mutually agreed upon timeframe.

(c) (1) If neither of the options described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) is available, and if the responsibility for arranging and providing specialty mental health services was not transferred, in accordance with Sections 14717.1 and 14717.2, payment for the specialty mental health services shall be made by the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction or through an agreement between the mental health plan in the county of residence and the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction.

(2) The mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction and the mental health plan in the county of residence shall enter into the agreement for payment of services within 30 days of notice, by either the placing agency or the placement provider, of the out-of-county placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 402, Sec. 4.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.26.

(a) For purposes of this section, “foster children” means Medi-Cal eligible children younger than 21 years of age who have been placed into foster care by a county child welfare agency or a county probation department.

(b) The department and the State Department of Social Services shall collect data on the receipt of specialty mental health services by foster children who are placed outside of their county of original jurisdiction. These data shall be included in the department’s Medi-Cal specialty mental health services performance dashboard, in compliance with all applicable state and federal privacy and confidentiality laws, and shall contain all of the following statewide information:

(1) The number of foster children placed out of county.

(2) The number of foster children placed out of county who receive specialty mental health services.

(3) For foster children placed out of county who receive specialty mental health services, the number of foster children for whom the county of original jurisdiction is responsible for providing or arranging for those services, and the number of foster children for whom the county of residence is responsible for that provision or arrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 402, Sec. 5.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.5.

(a) A mental health plan review shall be conducted annually by an external quality review organization (EQRO) pursuant to federal regulations at 42 C.F.R. 438.350 et seq. Commencing July 1, 2018, the review shall include specific data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care, including all of the following:

(1) The number of Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care served each year.

(2) Details on the types of mental health services provided to children, including prevention and treatment services. These types of services may include, but are not limited to, screenings, assessments, home-based mental health services, outpatient services, day treatment
 services or inpatient services, psychiatric hospitalizations, crisis interventions, case management, and psychotropic medication support services.

(3) Access to, and timeliness of, mental health services, as described in Sections 1300.67.2, 1300.67.2.1, and 1300.67.2.2 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations and consistent with Section 438.206 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, available to Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(4) Quality of mental health services available to Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(5) Translation and interpretation services, consistent with Section 438.10(c)(4) and (5) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 1810.410 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, available to Medi-Cal
 eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(6) Performance data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(7) Utilization data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(8) Medication monitoring consistent with the child welfare psychotropic medication measures developed by the State Department of Social Services and any Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) measures related to psychotropic medications, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Follow-Up Care for Children Prescribed Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder Medication (HEDIS ADD).

(B) Use of Multiple Concurrent Antipsychotics in
 Children and Adolescents (HEDIS APC).

(C) Use of First-Line Psychosocial Care for Children and Adolescents on Antipsychotics (HEDIS APP).

(D) Metabolic Monitoring for Children and Adolescents on Antipsychotics (HEDIS APM).

(b) (1) The department shall post the EQRO data disaggregated by Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care on the department’s Internet Web site in a manner that is publicly accessible.

(2) The department shall review the EQRO data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care.

(3) If the EQRO identifies deficiencies in a mental health plan’s ability to serve Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents
 in foster care, the department shall notify the mental health plan in writing of identified deficiencies.

(4) The mental health plan shall provide a written corrective action plan to the department within 60 days of receiving the notice required pursuant to paragraph (3). The department shall notify the mental health plan of approval of the corrective action plan or shall request changes, if necessary, within 30 days after receipt of the corrective action plan. Final corrective action plans shall be made publicly available by, at minimum, posting on the department’s Internet Web site.

(c) To the extent possible, the department shall, in connection with its duty to implement Section 14707.5, share with county boards of supervisors data that will assist in the development of mental health service plans, such as data described in federal regulations at 42 C.F.R. 438.350 et seq., in
 subdivision (c) of Section 16501.4 of this code, and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1538.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The department shall annually share performance outcome system data with county boards of supervisors for the purpose of informing mental health service plans. Performance outcome system data shared with county boards of supervisors shall include, but not be limited to, the following disaggregated data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care:

(1) The number of youth receiving specialty mental health services.

(2) The racial distribution of youth receiving specialty mental health services.

(3) The gender distribution of youth receiving specialty mental health services.

(4) The number of youth, by race, with one or more specialty mental health service visits.

(5) The number of youth, by race, with five or more specialty mental health service visits.

(6) Utilization data for intensive home services, intensive care coordination, case management, therapeutic behavioral services, medication support services, crisis intervention, crisis stabilization, full-day intensive treatment, full-day treatment, full-day rehabilitation, and hospital inpatient days.

(7) A unique count of youth receiving specialty mental health services who are arriving, exiting, and continuing with services.

(e) The department shall ensure that the performance outcome system data metrics
 include disaggregated data for Medi-Cal eligible minor and nonminor dependents in foster care. These data shall be in a format that can be analyzed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 290.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14718.

(a) This section shall be limited to specialty mental health services reimbursed to a mental health plan that certifies public expenditures subject to cost settlement or specialty mental health services reimbursed through the department’s fiscal intermediary.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to matters related to specialty mental health services provided under the approved Medi-Cal state plan and the Specialty Mental Health Services Waiver, including, but not limited to, reimbursement and claiming procedures, reviews and oversight, and appeal processes for mental health plans (MHPs) and MHP subcontractors.

(1) As determined by the department, the MHP
 shall submit claims for reimbursement to the Medi-Cal program for eligible services.

(2) The department may offset the amount of any federal disallowance, audit exception, or overpayment against subsequent claims from the MHP. The department may offset the amount of any state disallowance, or audit exception or overpayment against subsequent claims from the mental health plan, through the 2010–11 fiscal year. This offset may be done at any time, after the department has invoiced or otherwise notified the mental health plan about the audit exception, disallowance, or overpayment. The department shall determine the amount that may be withheld from each payment to the mental health plan. The maximum withheld amount shall be 25 percent of each payment as long as the department is able to comply with the federal requirements for repayment of federal financial participation pursuant to Section 1903(d)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1396b(d)(2)). The department may increase the maximum amount when necessary for compliance with federal laws and regulations.

(3) (A) Oversight by the department of the MHPs may include client record reviews of Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) specialty mental health services rendered by MHPs and MHP subcontractors under the Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver in addition to other audits or reviews that are conducted.

(B) The department may contract with an independent, nongovernmental entity to conduct client record reviews. The contract awarded in connection with this section shall be on a competitive bid basis, pursuant to the Department of General Services contracting requirements, and shall meet both of the following additional requirements:

(i) Require the entity awarded the contract to comply with all federal and state privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d et seq.) and its implementing regulations, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), and Section 1798.81.5 of the Civil Code. The entity shall be subject to existing penalties for violation of these laws.

(ii) Prohibit the entity awarded the contract from using or disclosing client records or client information for a purpose other than the one for which the record was given.

(iii) Prohibit the entity awarded the contract from selling client records or client information.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, the
 following terms shall have the following meanings:

(i) “Client record” means a medical record, chart, or similar file, as well as other documents containing information regarding an individual recipient of services, including, but not limited to, clinical information, dates and times of services, and other information relevant to the individual and services provided and that evidences compliance with legal requirements for Medi-Cal reimbursement.

(ii) “Client record review” means examination of the client record for a selected individual recipient for the purpose of confirming the existence of documents that verify compliance with legal requirements for claims submitted for Medi-Cal reimbursement.

(D) The department shall recover overpayments of federal financial participation from MHPs within the timeframes required
 by federal law and regulation for repayment to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(4) (A) The department, in consultation with mental health stakeholders, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and MHP subcontractor representatives, shall provide an appeals process that specifies a progressive process for resolution of disputes about claims or recoupments relating to specialty mental health services under the Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver.

(B) The department shall provide MHPs and MHP subcontractors the opportunity to directly appeal findings in accordance with procedures that are similar to those described in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 51016) of Chapter 3 of Subdivision 1 of Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, until new regulations for a progressive appeals process are
 promulgated. When an MHP subcontractor initiates an appeal, it shall give notice to the MHP. The department shall propose a rulemaking package consistent with the department’s appeals process that is in effect on July 1, 2012, by no later than the end of the 2013–14 fiscal year. The reference in this subparagraph to the procedures described in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 51016) of Chapter 3 of Subdivision 1 of Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall only apply to those appeals addressed in this subparagraph.

(C) The department shall develop regulations as necessary to implement this paragraph.

(5) The department shall conduct oversight of utilization controls as specified in Section 14133. The MHP shall include a requirement in any subcontracts that all inpatient subcontractors maintain necessary licensing and certification. MHPs shall require
 that services delivered by licensed staff are within their scope of practice. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the MHPs from establishing standards that are in addition to the federal and state requirements, provided that these standards do not violate federal and state requirements and guidelines.

(6) (A) Subject to federal approval and consistent with state requirements, the MHP may negotiate rates with providers of specialty mental health services.

(B) Any excess in the distribution of funds over the expenditures for services by the mental health plan shall be spent for the provision of specialty mental health services and related administrative costs.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall limit the MHP from being reimbursed appropriate federal financial participation for any qualified
 services. To receive federal financial participation, the mental health plan shall certify its public expenditures for specialty mental health services to the department.

(8) Notwithstanding Section 14115, claims for federal reimbursement for service pursuant to this chapter shall be submitted by MHPs within the timeframes required by federal Medicaid requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers.

(9) The MHP shall use the fiscal intermediary of the Medi-Cal program of the State Department of Health Care Services for the processing of claims for inpatient psychiatric hospital services rendered in fee-for-service Medi-Cal hospitals. The department shall request the Controller to offset the distribution of funds to the counties from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Subaccount, or the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund,
 or funds from the Mental Health Account or the Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 for the nonfederal financial participation share for these claims.

(c) Counties may set aside funds for self-insurance, audit settlement, and statewide program risk pools. The counties shall assume all responsibility and liability for appropriate administration of the funds. Special consideration may be given to small counties with a population of less than 200,000. This subdivision shall not make the state or department liable for mismanagement or loss of funds by the entity designated by counties under this subdivision.

(d) The department shall consult with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California in February and September of each year to obtain data and methodology necessary to forecast future fiscal trends in the provision of specialty mental
 health services provided under the Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver, to estimate yearly specialty mental health services related costs, and to estimate the annual amount of federal funding participation to reimburse costs of specialty mental health services provided under the Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver. This shall include a separate presentation of the data and methodology necessary to forecast future fiscal trends in the provision of Early Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment specialty mental health services provided under the Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver, to estimate annual EPSDT specialty mental health services related costs, and to estimate the annual amount of EPSDT specialty mental health services provided under the state Medi-Cal specialty mental health services waiver, including federal funding participation to reimburse costs of EPSDT.

(e) When seeking federal approval
 for any federal Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver associated with Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, the department shall consult with staff of the Legislature, counties, providers, and other stakeholders in the development of the state plan amendment or waiver.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 59.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14718.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, including subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code, the Controller may use the moneys in the Mental Health Managed Care Deposit Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Mental Health Managed Care Deposit Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with
 the carrying out of the object for which the Mental Health Managed Care Deposit Fund was created.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5778.3 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 180.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14721.

(a) This chapter shall only be implemented to the extent that the necessary federal waivers are obtained. The director shall execute a declaration, to be retained by the director, that a waiver necessary to implement any provision of this
 chapter
 has been obtained.

(b) This chapter shall become inoperative on the date that, and only if, the director executes a declaration, to be retained by the director, that more than 10 percent of all counties fail to become mental health plan contractors, and acceptable alternative contractors are not available, or if more than 10 percent of all funds allocated for Medi-Cal mental health services must be administered by the department because
 an acceptable plan is not available.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5780 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 182.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.    Note: Termination clause applies to Chapter 8.9, comprising Sections 14700 to 14726.)
-------------------------------------------

14722.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a mental health plan may enter into a contract for the provision of specialty mental health services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries with a hospital that provides for a per diem reimbursement rate for services that include room and board, routine hospital services, and all hospital-based ancillary services and that provides separately for the attending mental
 health professional’s daily visit fee. The payment of these negotiated reimbursement rates to the hospital by the mental health plan shall be considered payment in full for each day of inpatient psychiatric and hospital care rendered to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, subject to third-party liability and patient share of costs, if any.

(b) This section shall not be construed to allow a hospital to interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 of the Business and Professions Code or any other provision of law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “hospital” means a hospital that submits reimbursement claims for Medi-Cal psychiatric inpatient hospital services through the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5781 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 183.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14723.

(a) Each eligible public agency, as described in subdivision (b), may, in addition to reimbursement or other payments that the agency would otherwise receive for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided for in this section.

(b) A public agency shall be eligible for supplemental reimbursement only if it is a county, city, or city and county
 and if, consistent with Section 14718 it provides as a mental health plan, or subcontracts for, specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Consolidation Waiver (Number CA.17), as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), an eligible public agency’s supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in computing an eligible public agency’s reimbursement, in no instance shall the expenditures certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), when combined with the amount received from other sources of payment and with reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program, including expenditures otherwise certified for purposes of claiming federal financial participation, exceed 100 percent of actual, allowable costs, as determined pursuant to California’s Medicaid State Plan, for the specialty mental health services to which the expenditure relates. Supplemental
 payment may be made on an interim basis until the time when actual, allowable costs are finally determined.

(3) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed under a payment methodology based on specialty mental health services provided to Medi-Cal patients by each eligible public agency, on a per-visit basis, a per-procedure basis, a time basis, in one or more lump sums, or on any other federally permissible basis. The department shall seek approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the payment methodology to be utilized, and shall not make any payment pursuant to this section prior to obtaining that federal approval.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide the supplemental reimbursement described in this section without any expenditure from the General Fund. The department may require an eligible public agency, as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section, to enter into, and maintain, an agreement with the department for the purposes of implementing this section and reimbursing the department for the costs of administering this section.

(2) Expenditures submitted to the department
 for purposes of claiming federal financial participation under this section shall have been paid only with funds from the public agencies described in subdivision (b) and certified to the state as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) An eligible public agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for the specialty mental health services are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department.

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, any records specified by the department
 to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible public agency is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(f) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the program shall be limited to those costs that the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines to be allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation
 of this section, this section shall not be implemented.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures described in subdivision (e) related to specialty mental health services that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit any necessary materials to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to provide
 assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(g) (1) The director may adopt regulations as are necessary to implement this section. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision shall be deemed to be necessary for
 the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action.

(2) As an alternative to the adoption of regulations pursuant to paragraph (1), and notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may implement and administer this article, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action, provided that no bulletin or similar instruction shall remain in effect after June 30, 2011. It is the intent that regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be in place on or before June 30, 2011.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5783 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 185.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14725.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop a quality assurance program to govern the delivery of Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, in order to ensure quality patient care based on community standards of practice.

(b) The department shall issue standards and guidelines for local quality assurance activities. These standards and guidelines shall be reviewed and revised in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, as well as other stakeholders from the mental health community, including, but not limited to, individuals who receive services, family members, providers, mental health advocacy groups, and other interested parties. The standards and guidelines
 shall be based on federal Medicaid requirements.

(c) The standards and guidelines developed by the department shall reflect the special problems that small rural counties have in undertaking comprehensive quality assurance systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 60.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14726.

The department shall approve each local program’s initial quality assurance plan, and shall thereafter review and approve each program’s Medi-Cal specialty mental health services quality assurance plan whenever the plan is amended or changed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4071 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 58.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14727.

(a) A mental health plan shall notify beneficiaries, prospective beneficiaries, and members of the public of all of the following information:

(1) The availability of language assistance services, including oral interpretation and translated written materials, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those services are necessary to provide meaningful access to an individual with limited English proficiency (LEP).

(2) The availability of appropriate auxiliary aids and services, including qualified interpreters for individuals with disabilities and information in alternate formats, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those aids and services are necessary to ensure an equal opportunity to
 participate for individuals with disabilities.
